ava_misc.lexd
LEXICON QUOT

<quot>: # ;

###############################################################################

LEXICON Miscellaneous 

ян:ан QUOT ; # "" # Dir/LR
ан:ан QUOT ; # "" # Dir/LR
~ан:ан QUOT ; # "" # Dir/RL

гурищ:гурищ ADV1 ; # "ведь, разве не..."
гурин:гурин ADV1 ; # ""
гуреблъи:гуреблъи ADV1 ; # ""

гьале:гьале INTERJ ; # ""
гьеле:гьеле INTERJ ; # ""
